Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4963.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; POWER OF PEOPLE LEADERSHIP INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Power of People Leadership Institute to sustain the Girls Taking Action program to support mentoring, academic support, health and wellness counseling, financial education, and career development. The grant must be used to help students, especially girls of color, facing social, demographic, racial, and economic barriers improve graduation rates, pursue postsecondary education, and access workforce opportunities. Girls Taking Action must use a portion of this appropriation to continue expansion of services outside the seven-county metropolitan area. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Power of People Leadership Institute to sustain the five community-based Girls Taking Action programs in the seven-county metropolitan area and one community chapter in St. Cloud. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (c) $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Power of People Leadership Institute to sustain and expand the Boys of Hope program to support boys in at least 14 schools in the seven-county metropolitan area and St. Cloud and increase academic engagement while decreasing violence and behavior referrals. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end